District of Columbia statutes.
38-823.02

Programs.

The Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall, in conjunction with the Department of Health, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the District Department of the Environment, the University of the District of Columbia, community organizations, food service providers, public schools, and public charter schools, develop programs to promote the benefits of purchasing and eating locally grown and unprocessed foods that are from growers engaged in sustainable agriculture practices. At minimum, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall conduct at least one program per year, such as an annual local flavor week or a harvest of the month program, in collaboration with other District agencies and nonprofit organizations.

History

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 302, 57 DCR 4779